parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/PORTUGUESE/FST2/src/flex-rules.xfst
# ============================================================================
# TYPE:		(x)fst script
# CONTENT:      basic rules for additional lexicon entries
# 
# LANGUAGE:     PORTUGUESE
#
# AUTHOR:       A.Schiller
#
# CREATED:      07-Aug-2008
#
# ============================================================================
# USAGE:        xfst -e "read lex LEX.lexc"  -l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================



define LEX

# identify tags and markers
read regex LEX ;
single char sigma net
define SIG
read regex SIG & [%+ ?+ ];
multi char sigma net
define TAG

define CHAR SIG & ? ;


define MARKER 	"[*]" | "[-]"| "(-)" | "(.)" ;

define LBD	[ "^]" ];	# lemma boundary

define DEL	[ "^1" | "^2" ];	# deletion markers

define SPEC	[ DEL | LBD | MARKER ] ;



define VSimple	[a|e|i|o|u];
define VAccent	[ã|õ| â|ê| á|é|í|ó|ú];
define Vowel	VSimple | VAccent ;

define Cons	[b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z];


# ==============================================================================
read regex [
	0 <- SPEC

# optional hyphens
.o.	%- <- [ "[-]" | "(-)" ]

# optional dots
.o.	%. <- "(.)"

# adjective OR noun
.o.	[%+Adj|%+Noun] <- %+NAdj

# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
.o.	LEX 

# ------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# 
# hyphen or space
.o.	"[-]" -> [ %  | %- ]

# hyphen or nothing
.o.	"(-)" -> [ 0 | %- ]

# optional dots
.o.	"(.)" -> [ 0 | %. ]


# ----------------------------------------------------------------------
# alternative spelling for abbreviation endings ª and º

.o.	ª (->) {ª.} | {.ª} | {.a} | {a.}
.o.	º (->) {º.} | {.º} | {.o} | {o.}


# ----------------------------------------------------------------------
# regular noun and adjective inflection

# feminine
.o.	o -> 0		|| ã _ TAG* LBD $%+Fem
.o.	o -> a		|| _ TAG* LBD $%+Fem
.o.	[..] -> a	|| [ o r | o l | ê s | z ] _ TAG* LBD $%+Fem
.o.	e u -> [e|é] i a	|| _ TAG* LBD $%+Fem
.o.	é u -> é i a	|| _ TAG* LBD $%+Fem

# plural
# italiano -> italianos; alamana -> alemanas; inglés -> ingleses
.o.	a l -> a i s    || _ TAG* LBD $%+Pl
.o.	u m -> u n s    || _ TAG* LBD $%+Pl
.o.	[..] -> e s	|| [ o r | a r | ê s ] _  TAG* LBD $%+Pl
.o.	[..] -> s	|| Vowel _ TAG* LBD $%+Pl


# accent normalisation
.o.	ê -> e		|| _ s [e | a ] $LBD

# ----------------------------------------------------------------------
# remove tags and markers
.o.	[SPEC|TAG] -> 0

];
